Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of State  Police shall conduct a study to determine how
to increase and improve state criminal justice protective,  responsive and investigative re-
sources and systems for reporting, identification, investigation and  rapid response to future
and past cases of missing and murdered Native  American women in this state, including
cases involving Indian country.
(2) In conducting the study, the department shall consult with:
(a) The Commission on Indian Services to convene meetings with tribal and local law
enforcement partners, federally recognized tribes and urban  Indian organizations to deter-
mine the scope of the problem, identify  barriers and find ways to create partnerships to in-
crease reporting, identification, investigation  and rapid response to future and past cases of
missing and murdered Native American women in this state; and
(b) The United States  Department of Justice on ways to increase information sharing and
coordination of resources to focus on reporting, identification, investigation and rapid re-
sponse to future and past cases of missing and murdered Native American women in this
state.
(3) The Department of State Police shall report on  the results of the study to an appro-
priate committee or interim committee  of the Legislative Assembly no later than September
15, 2020.
(4) As used in this section, “Native American women” includes Alaska Native women.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2625 (HB 2625-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 6, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2625 (HB 2625-A) Page 2